Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.300

Interschool athletic activities—Washington interscholastic activities association rules.

(1) The eligibility of a charter school student to participate in interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association is subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

(2) A proposal by a charter school to regulate the conduct of interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association is subject to rules adopted by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

(3) The charter school is responsible for the full cost, minus any student participation fee, for any student who participates in interschool athletic activities or other interschool extracurricular activities governed by the Washington interscholastic activities association.

[ 2017 c 60 s 1; 2016 c 241 s 129.]